Washington statutes.
RCW 11.20.060

Record of will as evidence.

The record of any will made, probated and recorded as herein provided, and the exemplification of such record by the clerk in whose custody the same may be, shall be received as evidence, and shall be as effectual in all cases as the original would be if produced and proven.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.20.060. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 14; RRS s 1384; prior: 1891 p 382 s 7; Code 1881 s 1358; 1863 p 213 s 94; 1860 p 175 s 61.]

NOTES:

Certified copies of recorded instruments as evidence: RCW 5.44.060.